Nevada, session 83, AB148.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.269911 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269911 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
the county clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered
voter in the county and each person who registers to vote or updates
his or her voter registration information not later than the 14 days
before the election a mail ballot for every election. The county clerk
shall make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot
by a person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation,
by providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a
person who is elderly or disabled.
2. The county clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the county clerk
a written notice in the form prescribed by the county clerk which
must be received by the county clerk not later than 60 days before
the day of the election.
3. The county clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any
person who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) Elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The county clerk may allow a voter to elect to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 6 before the fifth Monday before the election. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to require a county clerk to
provide a mail ballot to any voter before mail ballots are available
for distribution.
5. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
[5.] 6. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 , [and] 3
[,] and 4, the mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, on or after the fifth Monday
before the election but not later than [20 days] the fourth Monday
before the election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
[6.] 7. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
[7.] 8. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the
mail ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this
section is moot and of no effect.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.565 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.565 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
sample ballots must include:
(a) If applicable, the statement required by NRS 293.267;
(b) The fiscal note or description of anticipated financial effect,
as provided pursuant to NRS 218D.810, 293.250, 293.481, 295.015,
295.095 or 295.230 for each proposed constitutional amendment,
statewide measure, measure to be voted upon only by a special
district or political subdivision and advisory question;
(c) An explanation, as provided pursuant to NRS 218D.810,
293.250, 293.481, 295.121 or 295.230, of each proposed
constitutional amendment, statewide measure, measure to be voted
upon only by a special district or political subdivision and advisory
question;
(d) Arguments for and against each proposed constitutional
amendment, statewide measure, measure to be voted upon only by a
special district or political subdivision and advisory question, and
rebuttals to each argument, as provided pursuant to NRS 218D.810,
293.250, 293.252 or 295.121; and
(e) The full text of each proposed constitutional amendment.
2. If, pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.2565, the word
“Incumbent” must appear on the ballot next to the name of the
candidate who is the incumbent, the word “Incumbent” must appear
on the sample ballot next to the name of the candidate who is the
incumbent.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
3. Sample ballots that are mailed to registered voters may be
printed without the full text of each proposed constitutional
amendment if:
(a) The cost of printing the sample ballots would be significantly
reduced if the full text of each proposed constitutional amendment
were not included;
(b) The county clerk ensures that a sample ballot that includes
the full text of each proposed constitutional amendment is provided
at no charge to each registered voter who requests such a sample
ballot; and
(c) The sample ballots provided to each polling place include the
full text of each proposed constitutional amendment.
4. A county clerk may establish a system for distributing
sample ballots by electronic means to each registered voter who
elects to receive a sample ballot by electronic means. Such a system
may include, without limitation, electronic mail or electronic access
through an Internet website. If a county clerk establishes such a
system and a registered voter elects to receive a sample ballot by
electronic means, the county clerk shall distribute the sample ballot
to the registered voter by electronic means pursuant to the
procedures and requirements set forth by regulations adopted by the
Secretary of State.
5. If a registered voter does not elect to receive a sample ballot
by electronic means pursuant to subsection 4, the county clerk shall
distribute the sample ballot to the registered voter by mail.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, before the
[period for early voting for any election begins,] applicable
deadline for distributing a mail ballot to a registered voter
established by NRS 293.269911, the county clerk shall distribute to
each registered voter in the county by mail or electronic means, as
applicable, the sample ballot for his or her precinct, with a notice
informing the voter of the location of his or her polling place or
places. If the location of the polling place or places has changed
since the last election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail a notice of the change to each
registered voter in the county not sooner than 10 days before
distributing the sample ballots; or
(b) The sample ballot must also include a notice in bold type
immediately above the location which states:
NOTICE: THE LOCATION OF YOUR POLLING PLACE OR
PLACES HAS CHANGED SINCE THE LAST ELECTION
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
7. If a person registers to vote less than 20 days before the date
of an election, the county clerk is not required to distribute to the
person the sample ballot for that election by mail or electronic
means.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a sample
ballot required to be distributed pursuant to this section must:
(a) Be prepared in at least 12-point type; and
(b) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice prepared in at least 20-point bold type that states:
NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
LARGE TYPE, CALL (Insert appropriate telephone number)
9. A portion of a sample ballot that contains a facsimile of the
display area of a voting device may include material in less than 12-
point type to the extent necessary to make the facsimile fit on the
pages of the sample ballot.
10. The sample ballot distributed to a person who requests a
sample ballot in large type by exercising the option provided
pursuant to NRS 293.508, or in any other manner, must be prepared
in at least 14-point type, or larger when practicable.
11. If a person requests a sample ballot in large type, the
county clerk shall ensure that all future sample ballots distributed to
that person from the county are in large type.
12. The county clerk shall include in each sample ballot a
statement indicating that the county clerk will, upon request of a
voter who is elderly or disabled, make reasonable accommodations
to allow the voter to vote at his or her polling place or places and
provide reasonable assistance to the voter in casting his or her vote,
including, without limitation, providing appropriate materials to
assist the voter. In addition, if the county clerk has provided
pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 293.2955 for the placement at
centralized voting locations of specially equipped voting devices for
use by voters who are elderly or disabled, the county clerk shall
include in the sample ballot a statement indicating:
(a) The addresses of such centralized voting locations;
(b) The types of specially equipped voting devices available at
such centralized voting locations; and
(c) That a voter who is elderly or disabled may cast his or her
ballot at such a centralized voting location rather than at his or her
regularly designated polling place or places.
13. The cost of distributing sample ballots for any election
other than a primary election, presidential preference primary
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
election or general election must be borne by the political
subdivision holding the election.
Sec. 3. NRS 293C.263 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.263 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
city clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered voter
in the city and each person who registers to vote or updates his or
her voter registration information not later than the 14 days before
the election a mail ballot for every election. The city clerk shall
make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot by a
person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation, by
providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a person
who is elderly or disabled.
2. The city clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the city clerk a
written notice in the form prescribed by the city clerk which must be
received by the city clerk not later than 60 days before the day of the
election.
3. The city clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any person
who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) Elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The city clerk may allow a voter to elect to receive a mail
ballot pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 6 before the fifth Monday before the election. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to require a city clerk to provide
a mail ballot to any voter before mail ballots are available for
distribution.
5. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
[5.] 6. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 , [and] 3
[,] and 4, the mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, on or after the fifth Monday
before the election but not later than [20 days] the fourth Monday
before the election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
[6.] 7. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
[7.] 8. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the
mail ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this
section is moot and of no effect.
Sec. 4. NRS 293C.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.530 1. A city clerk may establish a system for
distributing sample ballots by electronic means to each registered
voter who elects to receive a sample ballot by electronic means.
Such a system may include, without limitation, electronic mail or
electronic access through an Internet website. If a city clerk
establishes such a system and a registered voter elects to receive a
sample ballot by electronic means, the city clerk shall distribute the
sample ballot to the registered voter by electronic means pursuant to
the procedures and requirements set forth by regulations adopted by
the Secretary of State.
2. If a registered voter does not elect to receive a sample ballot
by electronic means pursuant to subsection 1, the city clerk shall
distribute the sample ballot to the registered voter by mail.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, before the
[period for early voting for any election begins,] applicable
deadline for distributing a mail ballot to a registered voter
established by NRS 293C.263, the city clerk shall distribute to each
registered voter in the city by mail or electronic means, as
applicable, the sample ballot for his or her precinct, with a notice
informing the voter of the location of his or her polling place or
places. If the location of the polling place or places has changed
since the last election:
(a) The city clerk shall mail a notice of the change to each
registered voter in the city not sooner than 10 days before
distributing the sample ballots; or
(b) The sample ballot must also include a notice in bold type
immediately above the location which states:
NOTICE: THE LOCATION OF YOUR POLLING PLACE OR
PLACES HAS CHANGED SINCE THE LAST ELECTION
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
4. If a person registers to vote less than 20 days before the date
of an election, the city clerk is not required to distribute to the
person the sample ballot for that election by mail or electronic
means.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a sample
ballot required to be distributed pursuant to this section must:
(a) Be prepared in at least 12-point type;
(b) Include the description of the anticipated financial effect and
explanation of each citywide measure and advisory question,
including arguments for and against the measure or question, as
required pursuant to NRS 295.205 or 295.217; and
(c) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice prepared in at least 20-point bold type that states:
NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
LARGE TYPE, CALL (Insert appropriate telephone number)
6. The word “Incumbent” must appear on the sample ballot
next to the name of the candidate who is the incumbent, if required
pursuant to NRS 293.2565.
7. A portion of a sample ballot that contains a facsimile of the
display area of a voting device may include material in less than
12-point type to the extent necessary to make the facsimile fit on the
pages of the sample ballot.
8. The sample ballot distributed to a person who requests a
sample ballot in large type by exercising the option provided
pursuant to NRS 293.508, or in any other manner, must be prepared
in at least 14-point type, or larger when practicable.
9. If a person requests a sample ballot in large type, the city
clerk shall ensure that all future sample ballots distributed to that
person from the city are in large type.
10. The city clerk shall include in each sample ballot a
statement indicating that the city clerk will, upon request of a voter
who is elderly or disabled, make reasonable accommodations to
allow the voter to vote at his or her polling place or places and
provide reasonable assistance to the voter in casting his or her vote,
including, without limitation, providing appropriate materials to
assist the voter. In addition, if the city clerk has provided pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 293C.281 for the placement at centralized
voting locations of specially equipped voting devices for use by
voters who are elderly or disabled, the city clerk shall include in the
sample ballot a statement indicating:
(a) The addresses of such centralized voting locations;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(b) The types of specially equipped voting devices available at
such centralized voting locations; and
(c) That a voter who is elderly or disabled may cast his or her
ballot at such a centralized voting location rather than at the voter’s
regularly designated polling place or places.
11. The cost of distributing sample ballots for a city election
must be borne by the city holding the election.
Sec. 5. NRS 266.0325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
266.0325 1. [At least 10 days before] Before the applicable
deadline for distributing mail ballots for an election held pursuant
to NRS 266.029, the county clerk or registrar of voters shall
distribute to each qualified elector by mail or electronic means, as
applicable, a sample ballot for the elector’s precinct with a notice
informing the elector of the location of the polling place for that
precinct. A sample ballot may be distributed by electronic means to
an elector only if the county clerk has established a system for
distributing sample ballots by electronic means pursuant to NRS
293.565 and the elector elects to receive a sample ballot by
electronic means.
2. The sample ballot must:
(a) Be in the form required by NRS 266.032.
(b) Include the information required by NRS 266.032.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, be prepared in
at least 12-point type.
(d) Describe the area proposed to be incorporated by assessor’s
parcel maps, existing boundaries of subdivision or parcel maps,
identifying visible ground features, extensions of the visible ground
features, or by any boundary that coincides with the official
boundary of the State, a county, a city, a township, a section or any
combination thereof.
(e) Contain a copy of the map or plat that was submitted with
the petition pursuant to NRS 266.019 and depicts the existing
dedicated streets, sewer interceptors and outfalls and their proposed
extensions.
(f) Include on the front page, in a separate box created by bold
lines, a notice prepared in at least 20-point bold type that states:
NOTICE: TO RECEIVE A SAMPLE BALLOT IN
LARGE TYPE, CALL (Insert appropriate telephone number)
3. A portion of a sample ballot that contains a facsimile of the
display area of a voting device may include material in less than
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
12-point type to the extent necessary to make the facsimile fit on the
pages of the sample ballot.
4. The sample ballot distributed to a person who requests a
sample ballot in large type by exercising the option provided
pursuant to NRS 293.508, or in any other manner, must be prepared
in at least 14-point type, or larger when practicable.
5. If a person requests a sample ballot in large type, the county
clerk shall ensure that all future sample ballots distributed to that
person from the county are in large type.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)